Utah statutes.
34A-6-304.   Procedure for review of order entered by administrative law
judge -- Continuing jurisdiction of commission.
(1) (a)  Administrative law judges assigned by the director of the Division of
Adjudication shall hear and determine any proceeding assigned to them by the
Division of Adjudication.
(b)  The administrative law judge shall enter the administrative law judge's
findings of fact, conclusions of law, and order not later than 30 days after
final receipt of all matters concerned in the hearing.
(c)  The findings of fact, conclusions of law, and order of the administrative
law judge shall become the final order of the commission unless objections are
made in accordance with Subsection (2).
(2) (a)  Any party of interest who is dissatisfied with the order entered by
an administrative law judge may obtain a review by appealing the decision in
accordance with Section 63G-4-301 and Chapter 1, Part 3, Adjudicative
Proceedings.
(b)  The commissioner or Appeals Board shall make its decision in accordance
with Section 34A-1-303.
(c)  The decision of the commission is final unless judicial review is
requested in accordance with Chapter 1, Part 3, Adjudicative Proceedings.
(d)  To the extent that new facts are provided, the commission has continuing
jurisdiction to amend, reverse, or enhance prior orders.
